Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3102
Removal; hearing; rights of person accused; conditions for release.

(a) The person whose removal is sought shall be brought before the judicial officer immediately upon arrest pursuant to the warrant; whereupon the judicial officer shall set a time and place for hearing, and shall advise the person of his right to have the assistance of counsel, to confront the witnesses against him, and to produce evidence in his own behalf at the hearing.

(b) The person whose removal is sought may at this time in writing waive the hearing and agree to be returned to the demanding court, judge, or magistrate. If a waiver is executed, the judicial officer shall issue an order pursuant to section 29-3103.

(c) The judicial officer may impose conditions of release authorized by the laws of this state which will reasonably assure the appearance at the hearing of the person whose removal is sought.

Laws 1969, c. 228, § 2, p. 852.